District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-2107

Patients of District and federal government.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 4, 1947, 61 Stat. 751, ch. 478, § 2
Nov. 8, 1984, 98 Stat. 3369, Pub. L. 98-621, § 10(d)(1)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-607.
1973 Ed., § 32-406a.

Effective Dates

Section 11(b) of Pub. L. 98-621 makes § 10 of that act effective on October 1, 1987.